California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(2) By November 1, 2024, the Controller shall, subject to the limitation in subdivision (a), transfer from the General Fund an amount that would enable funds disbursed to the sub-trust accounts for the 2023–24 fiscal year, pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 34019, Section 34019.01, and this paragraph, to be equal to the 2020–21 fiscal year baseline.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until December 31, 2026, and
 as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 35.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of December 31, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

34019.5.

Contracts entered into or amended by the State Department of Health Care Services to implement and administer the programs identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 34019 shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, shall be exempt from the State Administrative Manual, and shall not be
 subject to the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 40, Sec. 16.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

34020.

The Controller shall periodically audit the Tax Fund to ensure that those funds are used and accounted for in a manner consistent with this part and as otherwise required by law.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 64, Sec. 7.1.)
-------------------------------------------

34020.1.

(a) On or before March 1, 2025, the Department of Cannabis Control, in consultation with the Department of Finance and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, shall submit a report to the Legislature on the condition and health of the cannabis industry in the state. The report shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(1) How many local jurisdictions have permitted commercial cannabis activity.

(2) How many local jurisdictions have not permitted commercial cannabis activity.

(3) Information or analysis concerning the potential expansion or contraction of the cannabis market in
 the state, which may include information concerning any increase in retail cannabis sales and activity in the illicit market.

(4) How many equity licensees have been approved by the Department of Cannabis Control.

(5) In what counties the state equity licensees located.

(6) The health of the Cannabis Tax Fund, and any future projections of Cannabis Tax Fund revenues.

(7) Information on the viability of cannabis businesses in the state, and the ability to continue to operate cannabis businesses in the state, from a general and equity licensee standpoint.

(8) The impacts of the suspension of the cultivation tax imposed by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 34012, including whether
 that suspension resulted in a decrease in retail cannabis prices or increased participation in the legal cannabis market.

(b) The report may include recommendations to strengthen the state’s legal cannabis market.

(c) The Department of Cannabis Control may contract with a public university or universities in California to prepare the report. Subject to approval by the Department of Cannabis Control, the university or universities may contract with other organizations in connection with the report.

(d) The Department of Cannabis Control may consolidate this report with any other reports required under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 36.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

34021.

The taxes imposed by this part shall be in addition to any other tax imposed by a city, county, or city and county.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 64, Sec. 7.1.)
-------------------------------------------

34021.5.

(a) (1) A county may impose a tax on the privilege of cultivating, manufacturing, producing, processing, preparing, storing, providing, donating, selling, or distributing cannabis or cannabis products by a licensee operating under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) The board of supervisors shall specify in the ordinance proposing the tax the activities subject to the tax, the applicable rate or rates, the method of apportionment, if necessary, and the manner of collection of the tax. The tax may be imposed for general governmental purposes or for purposes specified in the ordinance by the board of supervisors.

(3) In addition to any other method of collection authorized by law, the board of supervisors may provide for the collection of the tax imposed pursuant to this section in the same manner, and subject to the same penalties and priority of lien, as other charges and taxes fixed and collected by the county. A tax imposed pursuant to this section is a tax and not a fee or special assessment. The board of supervisors shall specify whether the tax applies throughout the entire county or within the unincorporated area of the county.

(4) The tax authorized by this section may be imposed upon any or all of the activities set forth in paragraph (1), as specified in the ordinance, regardless of whether the activity is undertaken individually, collectively, or cooperatively, and regardless of whether the activity is for compensation or gratuitous, as determined by the board of supervisors.

(b) A tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be subject to applicable voter approval requirements imposed by law.

(c) This section is declaratory of existing law and does not limit or prohibit the levy or collection of any other fee, charge, or tax, or a license or service fee or charge upon, or related to, the activities set forth in subdivision (a) as otherwise provided by law. This section shall not be construed as a limitation upon the taxing authority of a county as provided by law.

(d) This section shall not be construed to authorize a county to impose a sales or use tax in addition to the sales and use taxes imposed under an ordinance conforming to the provisions of Sections 7202 and 7203 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 172.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 15. SUBSCRIPTION TELEVISION [35001. - 35003.]

35001.

For the purposes of this part, the following terms, phrases, words, and their derivations shall have the following meanings unless otherwise indicated by the context:

(a) “Local agency” shall mean a county, a city (whether general law or chartered city) and a city and county. For the purpose of applying Section 35003, the term “local agency” when used in reference to a county includes only unincorporated areas of such county.

(b) “Subscription televison” shall mean closed circuit television which is provided to and can be received only by subscribers. The provisions of this part shall not apply to community antenna television systems, hotel or apartment antenna systems, or educational television systems, whether closed or open circuit.

(c) “Subscription television business” shall mean the business of operating and providing subscription television to subscribers by the use of wires, lines, coaxial cables, wave guides or other tangible conduits of communication for the transmission to subscribers of television and music, including connecting the establishments of subscribers, or causing such establishments to be connected, with such communication conduits; provided, however, that this part shall not apply to a telephone or telegraph corporation subject to regulation by the Public Utilities Commission of the State of California when such telephone or
 telegraph corporation furnishes channels for the transmission of subscription television programs by a subscription television corporation.

(d) “Subscription television corporation” shall mean a person, firm, partnership or corporation owning, controlling, operating or managing a subscription television business.

(e) “Subscriber” shall mean any person, firm, partnership, corporation or other public or private entity agreeing to receive subscription television.

(f) “Total gross receipts” shall mean any and all compensation and other consideration in any form whatever received directly or indirectly by a subscription television corporation or sponsors. Total gross receipts shall not include any taxes on the services furnished by a subscription television corporation imposed directly on subscribers, or any fees payable
 pursuant to Section 35003 to the State or any local agency, and collected from subscribers by such subscription television corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 5.   Note: This section was repealed on Nov. 3, 1964, by initiative Prop. 15 (the Free Television Act), but that action was invalidated by the Calif. Supreme Court in its Weaver v. Jordan decision.)
-------------------------------------------

35002.

A subscription television corporation shall have authority to engage in the subscription television business in this State and within all or part of any local agency, local agencies, or combinations thereof, and in connection therewith to connect the establishments of subscribers, or to cause such establishments to be connected, with communication conduits by erecting, installing, constructing, repairing, replacing, reconstructing, maintaining and retaining such poles, wires, cables, conductors, ducts, conduits, vaults, manholes,
 amplifiers, appliances, attachments and other property as may be necessary for such purpose, in, on, over, along and across any public street, road, highway or freeway or in, on, over, along and across any of the waters within this State in such manner and at such points as not to incommode the public use of the street, road, highway or freeway or to interrupt the navigation of the waters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 5.   Note: This section was repealed on Nov. 3, 1964, by initiative Prop. 15 (the Free Television Act), but that action was invalidated by the Calif. Supreme Court in its Weaver v. Jordan decision.)
-------------------------------------------

35003.

(a) Each subscription television corporation shall pay quarterly to the State one percent (1%) of the total gross receipts received in such quarter by such subscription television corporation. All amounts required to be paid to the State under this subdivision shall be paid to the State Board of Equalization.

(b) In addition thereto such subscription television corporation shall pay to each local agency within which it is conducting operations one percent
 (1%) of the total gross receipts received in such quarter by such subscription television corporation from subscribers or sponsors whose establishments at which subscription television was provided were within such local agency at the time such revenues were received. The quarterly payments to a local agency required by this subdivision are in lieu of all other taxes or fees imposed by the local agency receiving the payments upon the subscription television corporation for the privilege of exercising any franchise or engaging in business. The State Board of Equalization shall collect any amount required to be paid to a local agency under this subdivision, and shall transmit to the local agency involved the amount so collected as promptly as feasible.

(c) The State Board of Equalization shall enforce the provisions of this part and shall adopt such reasonable rules and regulations as they may deem necessary or proper to provide for and
 facilitate the making and reporting of payments provided for in this section. At all reasonable times the State Board of Equalization may examine all records kept or maintained by such subscription television corporation or under its control which treat of the operations, affairs, property or transactions of the corporation with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 5.   Note: This section was repealed on Nov. 3, 1964, by initiative Prop. 15 (the Free Television Act), but that action was invalidated by the Calif. Supreme Court in its Weaver v. Jordan decision.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 16. FIREARM, FIREARM PRECURSOR PART, AND AMMUNITION EXCISE TAX [36001. - 36043.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [36001. - 36006.]

36001.

For purposes of this part:

(a) The following terms shall have the same meaning as those terms are defined in Division 2 (commencing with Section 16100) of Title 1 of Part 6 of the Penal Code: “ammunition,” “ammunition vendor,” and “firearm precursor part.”

(b) “Department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(c) “Firearm” shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16520 of the Penal Code.

(d) “Firearms manufacturer” means any entity licensed to manufacture firearms pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921)
 of Title 18 of the United States Code that engages in any retail sale of a firearm or firearm precursor part to a consumer in California.

(e) “Gross receipts” shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 6012.

(f) “Law enforcement agency” means any department or agency of the state or of any county, city, or other political subdivision thereof that employs any peace officer who is authorized to carry a firearm while on duty, or any department or agency of the federal government or a federally recognized Indian tribe with jurisdiction that has tribal land in California that employs any police officer or criminal investigator authorized to carry a firearm while on duty.

(g) “Licensed firearms dealer” shall have the same meaning provided in Section 26700 of the Penal Code.

(h) “Peace officer” means any person described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code who is authorized to carry a firearm on duty, or any police officer or criminal investigator employed by the federal government or a federally recognized Indian tribe with jurisdiction that has tribal land in California, who is authorized to carry a firearm while on duty.

(i) (1) “Retail sale” shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 6007.

(2) (A) For purposes of the excise tax imposed by Section 36011 only, a licensed firearms dealer, firearms manufacturer, or ammunition vendor in this state that transfers physical possession of any firearm, firearm precursor part, or ammunition to a purchaser in this state on behalf of an out-of-state retailer engaged in business in this state shall be deemed the retailer of the firearm, firearm precursor part, or ammunition.

(B) As used in this paragraph, the term “retailer engaged in business in this state” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (c) of Section 6203 and includes, but is not limited to, any retailer that meets the threshold set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 6203 by calculating its total combined sales of tangible personal property for delivery in this state pursuant to
 Section 6044.

(C) As used in this paragraph, the term “retailer” has the same meaning as that term is defined by Section 6015.

(D) This paragraph shall become operative on October 1, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 24.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

36005.

(a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury the Gun Violence Prevention and School Safety Fund to receive moneys pursuant to Section 36041.

(b) All moneys in the Gun Violence Prevention and School Safety Fund, including interest or dividends earned by the fund, shall be distributed annually in accordance with the allocation formula provided in subdivision (c), provided that the dollar amounts specified in that subdivision shall be annually adjusted to account for changes in the California Consumer Price Index.

(c) Moneys in the Gun Violence Prevention and School Safety Fund shall be annually allocated in the following order:

(1) The first seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) available in the fund, or as much of that amount as is available, shall be continuously appropriated annually to the Board of State and Community Corrections, or other successor agency designated by law as the administering agency for the California Violence Intervention and Prevention (CalVIP) Grant Program, to fund CalVIP Grants and administration and evaluations of CalVIP-supported programs, in accordance with Title 10.2 (commencing with Section 14130) of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(2) The next fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) available in the fund, or as much of that amount as is available, if any, shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be annually allocated to the State Department of Education to enhance school safety by addressing risk factors for gun violence affecting pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, through the funding of related
 measures, including, without limitation, the measures described in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive. The State Department of Education may use these funds to support both activities conducted directly by the State Department of Education and those conducted through contracts with, or grants to, other entities.

(A) Physical security improvements, including, but not limited to, the installation of interior locks for purposes of Section 17586 of the Education Code.

(B) Physical safety assessments.

(C) School-based or school-linked mental health and behavioral services, including training for teachers and employees.

(D) Before school and after school programs for at-risk pupils, including programs offered by entities eligible to receive funding under the
 Bipartisan Safer Communities Act Stronger Connections Grant Program.

(3) The next fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) available in the fund, or as much of that amount as is available, if any, shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be annually allocated to the Judicial Council to support a court-based firearm relinquishment grant program to be administered in coordination with the Department of Justice to ensure the prompt, consistent, and safe removal of firearms by the Department of Justice and local law enforcement agencies from individuals who become prohibited from owning or possessing firearms and ammunition pursuant to a criminal conviction or other criminal or civil court order, including, but not limited to, criminal protective orders, domestic violence restraining orders, gun violence restraining orders, civil harassment restraining orders, and workplace violence restraining orders. The grant program shall be designed to
 reduce the number of people who are entered into or remain in the Armed Prohibited Persons System, including by supporting partnerships with courts and local law enforcement agencies.

(4) The next fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) available in the fund, or as much of that amount as is available, if any, shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be annually allocated to the Department of Justice to fund a victims of gun violence grant program. The purpose of this program is to support evidence-based activities to equitably improve investigations and clearance rates in firearm homicide and firearm assault investigations in communities disproportionately impacted by firearm homicides and firearm assaults, and thereby help reduce gun violence in communities across California. Grants from this program shall be made on a competitive basis to state, local, or tribal law enforcement agencies and prosecuting offices for activities that have the
 specific objective of increasing clearance rates for firearm homicides and nonfatal shootings, which may include, without limitation, hiring and training detectives dedicated to investigating these offenses, hiring and training personnel or other partners to coordinate with victims and witnesses or to collect, process, and test relevant evidence, improving data analysis, forensics, and technological capacities, and promoting recurring and trauma-informed engagement with victims, witnesses, and other impacted community members in a manner that builds trust, safety, and collaboration.

(5) The next two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) available in the fund per year, or as much of that amount as is available, if any, shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be annually allocated to the Department of Justice to support activities to inform firearm and ammunition purchasers and firearm owners about gun safety laws and
 responsibilities, such as safe firearm storage, and to promote implementation and coordination of gun violence prevention efforts through activities such as technical assistance, training, capacity building, and local gun violence data and problem analysis support for local governments, law enforcement agencies, community-based service providers, and other stakeholders. The Department of Justice may use these funds to support activities conducted directly by the Department of Justice or conducted through contracts with, or grants to, other entities.

(6) The next two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) available in the fund, or as much of that amount as is available, if any, shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be annually allocated to the Office of Emergency Services to provide counseling and trauma-informed support services to direct and secondary victims of mass shootings and other gun homicides and to individuals who
 have experienced chronic exposure to community gun violence. The office may use these funds to support activities directly conducted by the office, or conducted through contracts with, or grants to, other entities, and to help reduce gun violence in communities across California.

(7) The next one million dollars ($1,000,000) available in the fund, or as much of that amount as is available, if any, shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be allocated to the University of California, Davis, California Firearm Violence Research Center, if those funds are accepted by the Regents of the University of California, for a one-time grant for gun violence research and initiatives to educate health care providers and other stakeholders about clinical tools and other interventions for preventing firearm suicide and injury. This allocation may, if sufficient funds are not available, be made over the course of more than one budget year; however, the
 total amount allocated pursuant to this paragraph across all years shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(d) Any remaining moneys available in the fund each year after the allocations described in subdivision (c) shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be allocated to fund and support activities and programs focused on preventing gun violence, supporting victims of gun violence, and otherwise remediating the harmful effects of gun violence.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in this section or in any other law, a department or agency may reserve up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated to that department or agency under subdivision (c) for the costs of administering and promoting the effectiveness of programs supported by this act, including, without limitation, costs to employ personnel, develop and review grant solicitations, publicize grant opportunities,
 engage with and provide technical assistance to prospective grant applicants and grantees, and conduct or support data collection or research evaluations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 180.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

36006.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “California Firearm Excise Tax Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 25.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Imposition and Rate of Tax [36011. - 36011.]

36011.

Commencing July 1, 2024, an excise tax is hereby imposed upon licensed firearms dealers, firearms manufacturers, and ammunition vendors, at the rate of 11 percent of the gross receipts from the retail sale in this state of any firearm, firearm precursor part, or ammunition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Exemptions [36021. - 36021.]

36021.

(a) There are exempted from the tax imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the retail sale of any firearm, firearm precursor part, or ammunition to any active or retired peace officer or any law enforcement agency employing that peace officer.

(b) There are exempted from the tax imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the retail sale of any firearm, firearm precursor part, or ammunition by any licensed firearms dealer, firearms manufacturer, or ammunition vendor in any quarterly period in which the total gross receipts from the retail sales of firearms, firearm precursor parts, or ammunition by that licensed firearms dealer, firearms manufacturer, or
 ammunition vendor is less than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Collection and Administration [36031. - 36039.]

36031.

(a) The department shall administer and collect the taxes imposed by this part pursuant to the Fee Collection Procedures Law (Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001)). For purposes of this part, the references in the Fee Collection Procedures Law to “fee” shall include the taxes imposed by this part, and references to “feepayer” shall mean any person liable for the payment of the taxes imposed under this part and collected pursuant to that law.

(b) The department may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations, including emergency regulations as necessary, relating to the administration and enforcement of this part, including, but not limited to,
 collections, reporting, refunds, and appeals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

36032.

The taxes imposed by this part are due and payable to the department quarterly on or before the last day of the month next succeeding each quarterly period of three months.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

36033.

On or before the last day of the month following each quarterly period, a return for the preceding quarterly period shall be filed with the department using electronic media. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

36034.

(a) By no later than March 31, 2024, and thereafter, by no later than the last day of each calendar quarter, the Department of Justice (DOJ) shall provide a list, including the names and business locations of all firearm dealers, firearm manufacturers, and ammunition vendors that are licensed by the DOJ or that are included on any of the centralized lists maintained by the DOJ pursuant to Sections 26715, 28450, and 29060 of the Penal Code, to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration (CDTFA) for the purposes of administering the excise tax imposed pursuant to this part. The DOJ shall also be authorized to provide this information to the CDTFA, upon its request, for the purposes of administering the excise tax imposed pursuant to this part.

(b) The authority of the DOJ to share the information described in subdivision (a) with the CDTFA shall be in addition to, and notwithstanding any other limitations on, the authority of the DOJ to share that information under any other statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

36035.

Each licensed firearms dealer, firearms manufacturer, or ammunition vendor subject to the excise tax imposed pursuant to this part shall register for a certificate of registration with the department using electronic media in a form prescribed by the department and shall set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or intends to transact business, the location of their place or
 places of business, and any other information as the department may require. An application for a certificate of registration shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department. No fee shall be charged for the application for, or issuance of, the certificate of registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

36036.

The department shall issue a certificate of registration to each eligible applicant that has properly registered pursuant to Section 36035. A certificate of registration issued pursuant to this section shall be valid until canceled or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

36037.

If the holder of a certificate of registration fails to comply with any provision of this part or any rule or regulation of the department prescribed and adopted under this part, the department shall provide notice in writing to the holder of the certificate of registration specifying the time and place of hearing and requiring the
 certificate holder to show cause why their certificate should not be revoked. The notice shall be provided no less than 10 days before the hearing and may be served personally or by mail in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination. The department may, after notice and hearing, revoke a certificate of registration for any such violation or
 omission, and notify the Department of Justice of the revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

36038.

The department shall notify the Department of Justice in the case of any of the following occurrences:

(a) If, after providing notice and the opportunity for a hearing, the department has, pursuant to Section 36037, revoked the certificate of registration of a licensed firearms dealer, ammunition vendor, or firearms manufacturer for violating any provision of this part.

(b) If, after providing notice and the opportunity for a hearing, the department has, pursuant to Section 6070, revoked or suspended the seller’s permit of a licensed firearms dealer, ammunition vendor, or firearms manufacturer for violating any provision of Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001).

(c) If the department has reinstated a certificate of registration or a seller’s permit of a licensed firearms dealer, ammunition vendor, or firearms manufacturer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

36039.

(a) The holder of a certificate of registration that has had their certificate revoked pursuant to Section 36037 may petition the department for reinstatement of the certificate by paying the amount of
 unpaid excise tax determined, together with any interest and penalties, demonstrating full compliance with the provisions of this part, and paying a fee of fifty dollars ($50) to the department for reinstatement.

(b) The department shall reinstate the certificate of registration of any revoked certificate holder that has satisfactorily complied with subdivision (a).

(c) The fee described in subdivision (a) shall not be
 subject to refund except as provided in Section 55221.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Disposition of Proceeds [36041. - 36041.]

36041.

All amounts required to be paid pursuant to Section 36011 shall be paid to the department in the form of remittances payable to the department, and those revenues, net of refunds, and costs of administration, shall be deposited in the Gun Violence Prevention and School Safety Fund, established pursuant to Section 36005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Nonpreemption [36042. - 36042.]

36042.

This part shall not be construed to preclude or preempt a local ordinance that imposes any additional requirements, fee, or surtax on the sale of firearms, ammunition, or firearm precursor parts. The tax imposed by this part shall be in addition to any other tax or fee imposed by the state, or a city, county, or city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Authority to Enact Emergency Regulations [36043. - 36043.]

36043.

If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the department shall be authorized to issue guidance or adopt regulations necessary to address any such invalidity and to promote the purposes of this act, including, but not limited to, guidance or regulations to modify or provide additional exemptions from the tax imposed by this act. Such guidance or regulations are exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and shall seek to ensure minimal disruption to funding and operations of programs and initiatives supported by the Gun Violence
 Prevention and School Safety Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 18.5. TIMBER YIELD TAX [38101. - 38908.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [38101. - 38110.]

38101.

This part is known and may be cited as the “Timber Yield Tax Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38101.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the forest resources and timberlands of the state are among the most valuable of the natural renewable resources of the state and that there is great concern throughout the state relating to their protection, restoration, and utilization.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that the forest resources and timberlands of the state produce timber and other forest products, recreational opportunities, regional economic vitality, employment opportunities, and aesthetic enjoyment while providing watershed protection and
 maintaining fisheries and wildlife.

(c) The Legislature further finds and declares that it is the policy of this state to encourage prudent and responsible forest resource management calculated to serve the public’s need for timber and other forest products, while giving consideration to the public’s need for watershed protection, fisheries and wildlife, employment opportunities, regional economic vitality, and recreational opportunities alike in this and future generations.

(d) The Legislature further finds that it is not the intent of the Legislature by the enactment of this part to take private property for public use without payment of just compensation in violation of the California and United States Constitutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1600, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

38102.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38103.

“Timber” means trees of any species maintained for eventual harvest for forest products purposes, whether planted or of natural growth, standing or down, including Christmas trees, on privately or publicly owned land, but does not mean nursery stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38103.1.

“Timberland” means privately or publicly owned land which is devoted to and used for growing and harvesting timber, or for growing and harvesting timber and compatible uses, and which is capable of growing an average annual volume of wood fiber of at least 15 cubic feet per acre.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38104.

“Timber owner” means any person who owns timber immediately prior to felling or the first person who acquires either the legal title or beneficial title to timber after it has been felled from land owned by a federal agency or any other person or agency or entity exempt from property taxation under the Constitution or laws of the United States or under the Constitution or laws of the State of California. “Timber owner” includes any person who owns or acquires legal title or beneficial title to downed timber in this state.

“Timber owner” also includes the seller of timber located on land owned by that seller if
 the timber sales agreement, contract, or other document provides for the payment of the purchase price on the basis of actual timber volume scaled and does not contain a passage of title clause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 947, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

38105.

“Rate adjustment county” means the following counties: Alpine, Del Norte, El Dorado, Glenn, Humboldt, Lassen, Mendocino, Modoc, Nevada, Placer, Plumas, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Tehama, Trinity, and Yuba.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38106.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, social club, fraternal organization, corporation, limited liability company, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, trustee, syndicate, this state, any county, city and county, municipality, district, or other political subdivision of the state, or any other group or combination acting as a unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 71.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

38108.

“Scaling date” means the date when the quantity of timber harvested, by species, is first definitely determined.

Except for national forest timber, the scaling date shall be no later than the date of delivery of the felled trees to the storage or wood-processing area, whichever is first, or an alternative approved by the board. For national forest timber, the definitely determined timber volume included in forest service, United States Department of Agriculture, billing statements to timber sale contract holders, or an alternative approved by the board after a public hearing, shall be the basis for tax
 payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

38109.
